Wyoming, session 2025, HB0077.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-20-106(a)(i)(C) is amended to
read:

31-20-106. Driver requirements.

(a) Before a transportation network company may allow
an individual to act as a driver, the transportation
network company shall:

HB0077

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0351
(i) Require the individual to submit to the
transportation network company an application that includes
all of the following:

(C) A photocopy of the Wyoming motor
vehicle registration for the transportation network company
vehicle that the individual will use to provide prearranged
rides;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0077